Tennessee, session 114, HB1141.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-11-203(b)(F)(iii), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting:
(iii) One (1) representative of the assisted-care living facility industry who may be
appointed from lists of qualified persons submitted by interested groups, including the
Tennessee Center for Assisted Living; and
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1141
002644
- 1 -